Utah statutes.
13-28-5.   Sales presentations.

If a prize notice requires or invites an individual to view, hear, or attend a sales presentation in order to claim a prize, the sales presentation may not begin until the solicitor does all of the following:

(1)  informs the individual of the prize, if any, that has been selected to be received by or awarded to the individual; and

(2)  if the individual has been awarded a prize, delivers to the individual the prize or the item selected by the individual under Section 13-28-6 if the prize is not available.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1995 General Session

